District of Columbia statutes.
47-377

Financial obligations of District.

The Mayor is authorized to establish such systems as may be required for the accounting and certification of financial obligations of the District of Columbia government and may, through delegations and designations of District government officials and agencies (identified by name in the District of Columbia Register prior to such delegation or designation), provide for the decentralized audit and approval before payment of bills, invoices, payrolls, and other evidence of claims, demands, or charges against the District of Columbia government.

History

June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 9, 27 DCR 1776
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-377.